District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.19

Repealed

Dividends not to be declared if corporation is thereby rendered insolvent or capital decreased — Exemption from liability for objecting trustees.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1287, ch. 854, § 623
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-219.
1981 Ed., § 29-219.
2001 Ed., § 29-201.19.